Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.030

Election—Review by boundary review board—Question stated.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for review by a boundary review board, the ballot proposition authorizing creation of a metropolitan park district that is submitted to voters for their approval or rejection shall appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date specified under RCW 29A.04.330 occurring sixty or more days after the last resolution proposing the creation of the park district is adopted or the date the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing the creation of the park district contains sufficient valid signatures. Where the petition or copy thereof is filed with two or more county auditors in the case of a proposed district in two or more counties, the county auditors shall confer and issue a joint certification upon finding that the required number of signatures on the petition has been obtained.

(2) Where the proposed district is located wholly or in part in a county in which a boundary review board has been created, notice of the proposal to create a metropolitan park district shall be filed with the boundary review board as provided under RCW 36.93.090 and the special election at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall be held on the special election date specified under RCW 29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the boundary review board is deemed to have approved the proposal, approves the proposal, or modifies and approves the proposal. The creation of a metropolitan park district is not subject to review by a boundary review board if the proposed district only includes one or more cities and in such cases the special election at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall be held as if a boundary review board does not exist in the county or counties.

(3) The petition proposing the creation of a metropolitan park district, or the resolution submitting the question to the voters, shall choose and describe the composition of the initial board of commissioners of the district that is proposed under RCW 35.61.050 and shall choose a name for the district. The proposition shall include the following terms:

□ "For the formation of a metropolitan park district to be governed by [insert board composition described in ballot proposition]."

□ "Against the formation of a metropolitan park district."

[ 2015 c 53 s 43; 2002 c 88 s 3; 1985 c 469 s 32; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.030. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-2, part; prior: 1909 c 131 s 1; 1907 c 98 s 2, part; RRS s 6721, part.]